Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3431
Local team member; contact, interview, or obtain information from family member or friend of deceased.

A member of the local team may contact, interview, or obtain information by request from a family member or friend of an individual whose death is being reviewed by the local team.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 88.